Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
STOPS
SECTION 1.  ORS 131.615 is amended to read:
131.615. (1) A peace officer who reasonably suspects  that a person has committed or is about to
commit a crime may stop  the person and, after informing the person that the peace officer is a peace
officer, make a reasonable inquiry.
(2) The detention and inquiry shall  be conducted in the vicinity of the stop and for no longer
than a reasonable time.
(3) The inquiry shall be considered reasonable if it is limited to:
(a) The immediate circumstances that aroused the officer’s suspicion;
(b) Other circumstances arising during the course of the detention and  inquiry that give rise to
a reasonable suspicion of criminal activity; and
(c) Ensuring the safety of the officer, the person stopped or other persons  present, including an
inquiry regarding the presence of weapons.
(4)(a) The inquiry may include a request for consent to search in relation to the circumstances
specified in subsection (3) of this section or to search for items of evidence otherwise  subject to
search or seizure under ORS 133.535  only if the officer first informs the person that the  person
has the right to refuse the request.
(b) An officer  who obtains consent to search under this subsection shall ensure that
there is a written, video or  audio record that the person gave informed and voluntary con-
sent to search.
(c) This subsection does not apply to implied  consent searches described in ORS 813.100,
813.131 or 813.135.
(5) A peace officer making a stop may use the degree of force reasonably necessary to make  the
stop and ensure the safety of  the peace officer, the person stopped or other persons who are present.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 810.410 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 1
810.410. (1) A police officer may arrest or issue a citation to  a person for a traffic crime at any
place within or outside the jurisdictional authority of the governmental unit by which  the police
officer is authorized to act as provided by ORS 133.235 and 133.310.
(2) A police  officer may issue a citation to a person for a traffic violation at any place within
or outside the jurisdictional authority of the governmental unit by which  the police officer is au-
thorized to act:
(a) When the traffic violation is committed in the police officer’s presence; or
(b) When the police  officer has probable cause to believe an offense has occurred based on a
description of the vehicle  or other information received from a police officer who observed the
traffic violation.
(3) A police officer:
(a) [ Shall] May  not arrest a person for a traffic violation.
(b) May stop and detain  a person for a traffic violation for the purposes of investigation rea-
sonably related to the traffic violation, identification and issuance of citation.
(c) May make  an inquiry into circumstances arising during the course of a detention and in-
vestigation under paragraph (b) of  this subsection that give rise to a reasonable suspicion of crimi-
nal activity.
(d) May make an inquiry to ensure the safety of the officer, the person stopped or  other persons
present, including an inquiry regarding the presence of weapons.
(e) May request consent to search in relation to the circumstances referred to in paragraph  (c)
of this subsection or to search for items of evidence otherwise subject to  search or seizure under
ORS 133.535[.], only if the officer first informs  the person that the person has the right to
refuse the request. If consent is obtained, the  officer shall ensure that there is a written,
video or audio record that the person gave informed and voluntary  consent to search. This
subsection does not apply to implied consent searches described in  ORS 813.100, 813.131 or
813.135.
(f) May use the degree of force reasonably necessary to make the  stop and ensure the safety
of the police officer, the person stopped or other persons present.
(g) May make an arrest of a person as authorized by  ORS 133.310 (2) if the person is stopped
and detained pursuant to the authority of this section.
(4) When a police officer at the scene of  a traffic accident has reasonable grounds, based upon
the police officer’s personal investigation, to  believe that a person involved in the accident has
committed a traffic offense in connection with the accident, the police officer may issue to  the per-
son a citation for that  offense. The authority under this subsection is in addition to any other au-
thority to issue a citation for a traffic offense.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 131.615 and 810.410 by sections 1 and 2 of this  2022
Act apply to stops and searches occurring on or after the operative date  specified in section
4 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 4. The amendments to ORS 131.615 and 810.410 by sections 1 and 2 of this  2022
Act become operative on January 1, 2023.
SECTION 5. Section 6 of this 2022 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 6. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 810.410, a police officer may not  initiate a traffic
violation stop for unlawful use or failure to use  lights under ORS 811.520 or operation with-
out required lighting equipment under ORS 816.330 if  the offense is based on the following
circumstances:
(a) A headlight  that is not in compliance with ORS 816.050 or 816.320, and the vehicle has
a headlight that is in compliance;
(b) A taillight that is not in compliance  with ORS 816.080 or 816.320, and the vehicle has
a taillight that is in compliance;
(c) A brake light that is not in  compliance with ORS 816.100 or 816.320, and the vehicle
has a brake light that is in compliance;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 2
(d) A taillight that does not emit red light as required by ORS 816.080 (2); or
(e) A registration plate light that is not in compliance with ORS 816.090 or 816.320.
(2) A police officer  may issue a citation for unlawful use or failure to use lights under
ORS 811.520 or operation without required lighting equipment under ORS 816.330 based  on
circumstances described in subsection (1) of this section only if the police officer  has already
stopped and detained the driver operating the  motor vehicle for a separate traffic violation
or other offense.
SECTION 7.
Section 6 of this 2022  Act applies to conduct alleged to constitute an offense
occurring on or after the operative date specified in section 8 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 8. Section 6 of this 2022 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2023.
COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS
SECTION 9.  ORS 181A.530 is amended to read:
181A.530. (1) Except for a  person who has requested and obtained an extension from the De-
partment of Public Safety Standards  and Training pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a person
may not be employed as a parole and probation officer for more than 18 months unless  the person
is a citizen of the United States or  a nonimmigrant legally admitted to the United States under a
Compact of Free Association, and:
(a) The person has been certified as being qualified as a parole and probation officer  under
provisions of ORS 181A.355  to 181A.689 and the certification has not lapsed or been revoked pur-
suant to ORS 181A.630, 181A.640 and 181A.650 (1) and not reissued under ORS 181A.650 (2); or
(b) The person is exempted from the certification requirement under ORS 181A.420 (1) and (2).
(2) The department, upon  the facts contained in an affidavit accompanying the request for an
extension, may find good  cause for failure to obtain certification within the time period described
in subsection (1) of this section. If the department finds  that there is good cause for failure to timely
obtain certification, the department may extend for up to one  year the period that a person may
serve as a parole and probation officer without certification. The grant or denial of an  extension is
within the sole discretion of the department.
(3) The initial training required for certification as a parole and probation officer, and
any mandatory training to maintain certification, must include training  in providing
trauma-informed care, culturally specific services and de-escalation techniques.
[(3)] (4) The certification of a parole and probation officer  shall lapse upon the passage of more
than three consecutive months during which period the officer is not employed as a  parole and
probation officer, unless the officer is on leave  from a law enforcement unit. Upon reemployment
as a parole and probation officer,  the person whose certification has lapsed may apply for certif-
ication in the manner provided in ORS 181A.355 to 181A.689.
[(4)] (5) In order to maintain certification, a parole and probation officer who is employed part-
time must complete annually at least 20 hours of continuing  education approved by the Department
of Public Safety Standards and Training.
[(5)] (6)  The requirement of  citizenship imposed under subsection (1) of this section does not
apply to a person employed as a parole and probation officer on September 27,  1987, who continues
to serve as a parole and probation officer.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 137.540 is amended to read:
137.540. (1) The court may sentence the defendant to probation subject to the  following general
conditions unless specifically deleted by the court. The probationer shall:
(a) Pay fines, restitution or other fees ordered by the court.
[(b) Not use or possess controlled substances except pursuant to a medical prescription. ]
[(c)] (b)  Submit to testing for controlled substance, cannabis or alcohol use if the  probationer
has a history of substance  abuse or if there is a reasonable suspicion that the probationer has ille-
gally used controlled substances.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 3
[(d)] (c)  Participate in a substance abuse evaluation as directed by the  supervising officer and
follow the recommendations of the evaluator if there are reasonable grounds  to believe there is a
history of substance abuse.
[(e)] (d) Remain in the State of Oregon until written permission to leave is granted by  the De-
partment of Corrections or a county community corrections agency.
[(f) If physically able, find and maintain gainful full-time employment, approved schooling, or a
full-time combination of both. Any waiver of this requirement must be based on a finding by the court
stating the reasons for the waiver. ]
[(g)] (e)  [ Change neither employment nor ] Not change  residence  without prior permission from
the Department of Corrections or a county community corrections agency  and inform the parole
and probation officer of any change in employment .
[(h)] (f)  Permit the parole and probation officer to  visit the probationer or the probationer’s
work site or residence and to conduct a walk-through of the common areas  and of the rooms in the
residence occupied by or under the control of the probationer.
[(i)] (g)  Consent to the search of person,  vehicle or premises upon the request of a represen-
tative of the supervising officer if the  supervising officer has reasonable grounds to believe that
evidence of a violation will be found, and submit to  fingerprinting or photographing, or both, when
requested by the Department of Corrections or a county community corrections agency for  super-
vision purposes.
[(j)] (h)  Obey all laws, municipal, county, state  and federal , and in circumstances in which
state and federal law conflict, obey state law .
[(k)] (i)  Promptly and truthfully answer all reasonable inquiries by  the Department of Cor-
rections or a county community corrections agency.
[(L)] (j)  Not possess weapons, firearms or dangerous animals.
[(m)] (k)  Report as required and abide by the direction of the supervising officer.
[(n)] (L)  If recommended by the supervising officer, successfully  complete a sex offender treat-
ment program approved by the supervising officer and submit to polygraph examinations at the  di-
rection of the supervising officer if the probationer:
(A) Is under supervision for a sex offense under ORS 163.305 to 163.467;
(B) Was previously convicted of a sex offense under ORS 163.305 to 163.467; or
(C) Was previously convicted in another jurisdiction  of an offense that would constitute a sex
offense under ORS 163.305 to 163.467 if committed in this state.
[(o)] (m)  Participate in a mental health evaluation as directed by the supervising officer  and
follow the recommendation of the evaluator.
[(p)] (n) If required to report as a sex offender under ORS 163A.015,  report with the Department
of State Police, a city police department, a county sheriff’s office or the supervising agency:
(A) When supervision begins;
(B) Within 10 days of a change in residence;
(C) Once each year within 10 days of the probationer’s date of birth;
(D) Within 10 days of the first day the person works at, carries on a  vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(E) Within 10 days of  a change in work, vocation or attendance status at an institution of higher
education.
[(q)] (o)  Submit to a risk and  needs assessment as directed by the supervising officer and follow
reasonable recommendations resulting from the assessment.
(2) In addition to the general  conditions, the court may impose any special conditions of pro-
bation that are reasonably related to the crime of conviction or the needs of the probationer  for the
protection of the public or reformation of the  probationer, or both, including, but not limited to, that
the probationer shall:
(a) For crimes committed prior to November 1, 1989,  and misdemeanors committed on or after
November 1, 1989,  be confined to the county jail or be restricted to the probationer’s own residence
or to the premises thereof,  or be subject to any combination of such confinement and restriction,
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 4
such confinement or restriction or combination thereof to be for a period not to exceed  one year
or one-half of the maximum period  of confinement that could be imposed for the offense for which
the defendant is convicted, whichever is the lesser.
(b) For felonies committed on or after November 1, 1989:
(A) Be confined in the county jail, or be subject to other custodial  sanctions under community
supervision, or both, as provided by rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission; and
(B) Comply with any special conditions of probation that are imposed  by the supervising officer
in accordance with subsection (9) of this section.
(c) For crimes committed on or after  December 5, 1996, sell any assets of the probationer as
specifically ordered by the court in order to pay restitution.
(d) For crimes constituting delivery of a controlled  substance, as those terms are defined in ORS
475.005, or for telephonic harassment under ORS 166.090, or for  crimes involving domestic violence,
as defined in ORS 135.230, be prohibited from using  Internet websites that provide anonymous text
message services.
(e) Not use or possess controlled substances except pursuant to a medical prescription.
(3)(a) If a person is released on probation following conviction  of stalking under ORS 163.732
(2)(b) or violating a court’s stalking protective  order under ORS 163.750 (2)(b), the court may include
as a special condition of the person’s probation reasonable residency restrictions.
(b) If the court imposes the special condition of probation described in this subsection  and if at
any time during  the period of probation the victim moves to a location that causes the probationer
to be in violation of the special condition of probation, the  court may not require the probationer
to change the probationer’s residence in order to comply with the special condition of probation.
(4) When a person who is a  sex offender is released on probation, the court shall impose as a
special condition of  probation that the person not reside in any dwelling in which another sex
offender who is on probation,  parole or post-prison supervision resides, without the approval of the
person’s supervising parole and probation officer, or in which more than one other sex offender  who
is on probation, parole or post-prison supervision resides, without the  approval of the director of the
probation agency that is  supervising the person or of the county manager of the Department of
Corrections, or a designee of the  director or manager. As soon as practicable, the supervising parole
and probation officer  of a person subject to the requirements of this subsection shall review the
person’s living arrangement with the person’s sex offender treatment provider to ensure that the
arrangement supports the goals of offender rehabilitation and community safety. As used  in this
subsection:
(a) “Dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469B.100.
(b) “Dwelling” does not include a residential treatment facility or a halfway house.
(c) “Halfway house” means a publicly or privately operated profit or nonprofit residential  facil-
ity that provides rehabilitative care and treatment for sex offenders.
(d) “Sex offender” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
(5)(a) If the person is released on probation following conviction of a sex crime,  as defined in
ORS 163A.005,  or an assault, as defined in ORS 163.175 or 163.185, and the victim was under 18
years of  age, the court, if requested by the victim, shall include as a special condition of the person’s
probation that the person not reside within three miles of the victim unless:
(A) The victim resides in a county having a population of less than 130,000  and the person is
required to reside in that county;
(B) The person demonstrates to the court by a preponderance of the evidence that  no mental
intimidation or pressure was brought to bear during the commission of the crime;
(C) The person demonstrates to the court by a preponderance of the evidence that imposition
of the condition will deprive the person of a residence that would be materially significant in aiding
in the rehabilitation of the person or in the success of the probation; or
(D) The  person resides in a halfway house. As used in this subparagraph, “halfway house” means
a publicly or privately operated profit or nonprofit residential facility  that provides rehabilitative
care and treatment for sex offenders.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 5
(b) A victim may request imposition of the  special condition of probation described in this sub-
section at the time of sentencing in person or through the prosecuting attorney.
(c) If the court imposes the special condition of probation described in this subsection and  if at
any time during the period of probation the victim moves to within three miles of  the probationer’s
residence, the court may not require the  probationer to change the probationer’s residence in order
to comply with the special condition of probation.
(6) When a person who is  a sex offender, as defined in ORS 163A.005, is released on probation,
the Department of Corrections or the county community corrections  agency, whichever is appro-
priate, shall notify the city police department,  if the person is going to reside within a city, and the
county sheriff’s office of the county in which the person is  going to reside of the person’s release
and the conditions of the person’s release.
(7) Failure to abide by all general and special conditions of  probation may result in arrest,
modification of conditions, revocation of probation or imposition of  structured, intermediate sanc-
tions in accordance with rules adopted under ORS 137.595.
(8) The court may order that probation be supervised by the court.
(9)(a) The court may at any time modify the conditions of probation.
(b) When the  court orders a defendant placed under the supervision of the Department of Cor-
rections or a community corrections  agency, the supervising officer may file with the court a pro-
posed modification to the special conditions of probation.  The supervising officer shall provide a
copy of the proposed modification to the district  attorney and the probationer, and shall notify the
probationer  of  the right to file an objection and have a hearing as described in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph. The notice requirement may be satisfied by providing the  probationer with a copy
of a form developed in accordance with rules adopted under ORS 137.595 (2)(b)  that describes the
right to a hearing. If the district attorney or probationer:
(A) Files an objection to the proposed modification less than five judicial days after the proposed
modification was filed, the court shall schedule a hearing no later than 10 judicial days after  the
proposed modification was filed, unless the court finds good cause to  schedule a hearing at a later
time.
(B) Does not file an objection to the proposed modification less  than five judicial days after the
proposed modification was filed, the proposed modification becomes effective  five judicial days after
the proposed modification was filed.
(10) A court may not order revocation of probation as a result of the probationer’s  failure to
pay restitution unless the court determines from  the totality of the circumstances that the purposes
of the probation are not being served.
(11) If the court ordered as a  special condition of probation that the probationer find and
maintain employment,  it is not a cause for  revocation of probation that the probationer failed to
apply for or accept employment at  any workplace where there is a labor dispute in progress. As
used in this subsection, “labor dispute” has the meaning for that term provided in ORS 662.010.
(12) As used in  this section, “attends,” “institution of higher education,” “works” and “carries
on a vocation” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 144.102 is amended to read:
144.102. (1) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or local supervisory authority
responsible for correctional services  for a person shall specify in writing the conditions of post-
prison supervision imposed under ORS 144.096. A copy of the  conditions must be given to the person
upon release from prison or jail.
(2) The board or the supervisory authority shall determine, and may at any time modify, the
conditions of post-prison supervision, which may include, among  other conditions, that the person
shall:
(a) Comply with the conditions of  post-prison supervision as specified by the board or supervi-
sory authority.
(b) Be under the supervision of the  Department of Corrections and its representatives or other
supervisory authority and abide by their direction and counsel.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 6
(c) Answer all reasonable inquiries of the board, the department or the supervisory authority.
(d) Report to the parole officer as directed by the board, the department or the supervisory au-
thority.
(e) Not own, possess or be in control of any weapon.
(f) Respect and obey all municipal, county, state and federal laws , and in circumstances  in
which state and federal law conflict, obey state law .
(g) Understand that the board or supervisory authority may, at its  discretion, punish violations
of post-prison supervision.
(h) Attend a victim impact treatment session in a county that has a victim impact program.
(i) For crimes constituting delivery of a controlled substance, as those terms are defined in  ORS
475.005, or for telephonic harassment under ORS 166.090, or for  crimes involving domestic violence,
as defined in ORS 135.230, be prohibited from using  Internet websites that provide anonymous text
message services.
(3) If the person is required to report as a sex offender  under ORS 163A.010, the board or su-
pervisory authority shall  include as a condition of post-prison supervision that the person report
with the  Department of State Police, a city police department, a county sheriff’s office or the
supervising agency:
(a) When supervision begins;
(b) Within 10 days of a change in residence;
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s date of birth;
(d) Within 10 days of the first day the person works at, carries  on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or  attendance status at an institution of higher
education.
(4)(a) The board or supervisory authority may establish special conditions that the board or
supervisory  authority  considers necessary because of the individual circumstances of the person on
post-prison supervision.
(b) If the person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of a sex crime, as defined  in
ORS 163A.005, the board or supervisory authority shall include all of the following as special con-
ditions of the person’s post-prison supervision:
(A) Agreement  to comply with a curfew set by the board, the supervisory authority or the
supervising officer.
(B) A prohibition against contacting a person under  18 years of age without the prior written
approval of the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(C) A prohibition against being present more than one time, without the prior written  approval
of the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer, at  a place where persons under 18 years
of age regularly congregate.
(D) In addition to the  prohibition under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, a prohibition
against being present,  without the prior written approval of the board, supervisory authority or
supervising officer, at, or on property  adjacent to, a school, child care center, playground or other
place intended for use primarily by persons under 18 years of age.
(E) A prohibition against working or volunteering at a school,  child care center, park, play-
ground or other place where persons under 18 years of age regularly congregate.
(F) Entry into and completion of or successful  discharge from a sex offender treatment program
approved by the board,  supervisory authority or supervising officer. The program may include
polygraph and plethysmograph testing. The person  is responsible for paying for the treatment pro-
gram.
(G) A prohibition against direct or indirect contact with the victim, unless approved by  the
victim, the person’s treatment provider and the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(H) Unless otherwise indicated for the treatment required under subparagraph  (F) of this para-
graph, a prohibition against viewing, listening to, owning or possessing sexually  stimulating visual
or auditory materials that are relevant to the person’s deviant behavior.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 7
(I) Agreement to consent to a search of  the person or the vehicle or residence of the person
upon the request of a representative of the board or supervisory  authority if the representative has
reasonable grounds to believe that evidence  of a violation of a condition of post-prison supervision
will be found.
(J) Participation  in random polygraph examinations to obtain information for risk management
and treatment. The person is responsible for paying  the expenses of the examinations. The results
of a polygraph examination under this subparagraph may not be used in evidence in a  hearing to
prove a violation of post-prison supervision.
(K) Maintenance of a driving log  and a prohibition against driving a motor vehicle alone unless
approved by the board, supervisory authority or supervising officer.
(L) A prohibition  against using a post-office box unless approved by the board, supervisory au-
thority or supervising officer.
(M) A prohibition against residing in a dwelling in  which another sex offender who is on pro-
bation, parole or post-prison supervision resides unless approved  by the board, supervisory authority
or supervising officer, or in which more than one other sex offender who is on probation, parole  or
post-prison supervision resides  unless approved by the board or the director of the supervisory au-
thority, or a designee of the board or director. As soon as practicable, the supervising officer  of a
person subject to the requirements  of this subparagraph shall review the person’s living arrange-
ment with the person’s sex offender treatment provider to ensure that the arrangement supports the
goals of offender rehabilitation and community safety.
(c)(A) If the person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of a sex crime, as  defined
in ORS 163A.005, or an assault, as defined in ORS  163.175 or 163.185, and the victim was under 18
years of age, the board or supervisory authority,  if requested by the victim, shall include as a spe-
cial condition of the  person’s post-prison supervision that the person not reside within three miles
of the victim unless:
(i) The victim resides in a county having  a population of less than 130,000 and the person is
required to reside in that county under subsection (7) of this section;
(ii) The person demonstrates to the board or supervisory authority by a preponderance  of the
evidence that no mental intimidation or pressure was brought to bear during  the commission of the
crime;
(iii) The person demonstrates to the board or supervisory authority by a preponderance  of the
evidence that imposition of the  condition will deprive the person of a residence that would be
materially significant  in aiding in the rehabilitation of the person or in the success of the post-prison
supervision; or
(iv) The person resides in a halfway house.
(B) A victim may request imposition of the special condition  of post-prison supervision described
in this paragraph  at the time of sentencing in person or through the prosecuting attorney. A victim’s
request may be included in the judgment document.
(C) If the board or supervisory authority  imposes the special condition of post-prison supervision
described in this paragraph  and if at any time during the period of post-prison supervision the victim
moves to within three miles of the person’s residence, the board or  supervisory authority may not
require the person to change the person’s residence in  order to comply with the special condition
of post-prison supervision.
(d)(A) If a person is on post-prison supervision following conviction of stalking under ORS
163.732 (2)(b) or violating a court’s stalking protective order under ORS 163.750 (2)(b), the board or
supervisory authority may include as a special condition of the person’s post-prison  supervision
reasonable residency restrictions.
(B) If the board or supervisory authority  imposes the special condition of post-prison supervision
described in this paragraph  and if at any time during the period of post-prison supervision the victim
moves to a location that causes the person to be in violation of the special condition of  post-prison
supervision, the board or supervisory authority may not require the person to change the person’s
residence in order to comply with the special condition of post-prison supervision.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 8
(5)(a) The  board or supervisory authority may require the person to pay, as a condition of
post-prison supervision, compensatory fines, restitution or attorney fees:
(A) As determined, imposed or required by the sentencing court; or
(B) When previously required as a condition of any type of supervision that is later revoked.
(b) The board may require a person to  pay restitution as a condition of post-prison supervision
imposed for an offense other than the offense for which the restitution was ordered if the person:
(A) Was ordered to pay restitution as a result of another conviction; and
(B) Has  not fully paid the restitution by the time the person has completed the period of post-
prison supervision imposed for the offense for which the restitution was ordered.
(6) A person’s failure to  apply for or accept employment at a workplace where there is a labor
dispute in progress does not constitute a violation of the conditions of post-prison supervision.
(7)(a) When a person is released from imprisonment on post-prison supervision, the board shall
order as a condition of post-prison supervision that the person reside for  the first six months after
release in the county that last supervised the person, if the person was on active  supervision as an
adult for a felony at the time of the offense that resulted in the imprisonment.
(b) If the person was not on active supervision as an  adult for a felony at the time of the offense
that resulted in the imprisonment, the board shall  order as a condition of post-prison supervision
that the person reside for the first six months after release in the county where the person resided
at the time of the offense that resulted in the imprisonment.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) The board shall determine the county where the person resided at  the time of the offense
by examining records such as:
(i) An Oregon driver license, regardless of its validity;
(ii) Records maintained by the Department of Revenue;
(iii) Records maintained by the Department of State Police;
(iv) Records maintained by the Department of Human Services;
(v) Records maintained by the Department of Corrections; and
(vi) Records maintained by the Oregon Health Authority.
(B) If the person did not have an identifiable address at the  time of the offense, or the address
cannot  be  determined, the person is considered to have resided in the county where the offense oc-
curred.
(C) If the person is serving multiple sentences, the county of residence is determined according
to the date of the last arrest resulting in a conviction.
(D) In determining the person’s county of residence, the board  may not consider offenses com-
mitted by the person while the person was incarcerated in a Department of Corrections facility.
(d) Upon motion of the board, the supervisory authority, the person, a victim or a district  at-
torney, the board may waive the residency condition under paragraph (b) of this subsection only
after making a finding that one of the following conditions has been met:
(A) The person provides proof of employment with no set ending  date in a county other than the
county of residence determined under paragraph (c) of this section;
(B) The person is found to pose a significant danger to a victim of the person’s crime  residing
in the county of residence, or a victim or victim’s family residing  in the county of residence is found
to pose a significant danger to the person;
(C) The person has a spouse or biological or adoptive family residing in a county other  than the
county of residence who will be materially significant in aiding in the rehabilitation  of the person
and in the success of the post-prison supervision;
(D) As another  condition of post-prison supervision, the person is required to participate in a
treatment program that is not available in the county of residence;
(E) The person requests release to another state; or
(F) The board finds other good cause for the waiver.
(e) The board shall consider eligibility for  transitional housing programs and residential treat-
ment programs when determining whether to waive the residency condition under  paragraph (b) of
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 9
this subsection, and the acceptance of the person into a transitional  housing program or a residen-
tial treatment program constitutes good cause as described in paragraph (d)(F) of this subsection.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,”  “carries on a vocation,” “institution of higher education” and “works” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b)(A) “Dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469B.100.
(B) “Dwelling” does not mean a residential treatment facility or a halfway house.
(c) “Halfway house” means a residential facility that  provides rehabilitative care and treatment
for sex offenders.
(d) “Labor dispute” has the meaning given that term in ORS 662.010.
SECTION 12.
The Department of Corrections,  in consultation with county community
corrections agencies, community members, including persons currently or formerly  under
supervision, and organizations that provide culturally  specific services, shall adopt rules for
standards concerning the location of supervision visits,  the frequency of visits and the
manner of reporting, for persons on supervision. The rules  must take into account
evidence-based practices and must require consideration  of the risks, needs and responsivity
of each supervised person and the goals for completion of supervision. The rules  must in-
clude a reporting process that is designed to minimize disruptions to the life of the super-
vised person and avoid unnecessary hardships, while offering the supervised person a  broad
array of reporting options, and that is focused on the success of the person on supervision.
JUSTICE REINVESTMENT
(Justice Reinvestment Equity Program)
SECTION 13.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Emergency Board by section 168, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium beginning July 1,  2021, for allocation to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
for a Transforming Justice Initiative, is decreased by $10,000,000.
SECTION 14. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000,  for distribution to the Northwest Health
Foundation Fund II to carry out the provisions of section 15 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 15. (1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall distribute the  moneys
received pursuant  to section 14 of this 2022 Act to the Northwest Health Foundation Fund
II to fund  the Justice Reinvestment Equity Program. The program shall consist of the pro-
vision of subgrants and technical assistance by the Northwest Health Foundation  Fund II to
culturally specific organizations and culturally responsive service  providers for the following
purposes:
(a) Mental health and substance use disorder treatment;
(b) Maternal health services;
(c) Trauma-informed restorative justice services;
(d) Violence reduction programs,  including but not limited to violence interruption men-
tors or after-school programs focused on art, music, theater or dance;
(e) Crisis intervention without police involvement;
(f) Reentry programs that are connected to education, workforce  development and tran-
sitional supports;
(g) Long-term supportive housing;
(h) Support for setting aside conviction records;
(i) Pretrial release support;
(j) Services for victims, including incarcerated victims or victims on pretrial release;
(k) Programs  for persons, and families of persons, who are currently or were formerly
incarcerated;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 10
(L) Programs designed to reduce recidivism and reduce contact  with the criminal justice
system;
(m) Programs  for persons who have been impacted by police violence, either directly or
through a family member; or
(n) Planning grants and technical assistance  to support the development of new cul-
turally specific services, or to strengthen existing  services, that are aligned with the other
purposes described in this subsection.
(2) Recognizing that  systemic racism exists within this state and within the criminal
justice system, and that culturally specific organizations and culturally  responsive services
must be expanded to address those disparities, the purpose of  the Justice Reinvestment Eq-
uity Program is to promote racial equity, reduce racial disparities, reduce recidivism and
decrease a county’s utilization of imprisonment in a Department of  Corrections institution,
all while protecting public safety and holding offenders accountable.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1)  of this section, up to three percent of funds distrib-
uted under this section may be used by the Northwest Health Foundation Fund II for ad-
ministrative costs.
(4) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions
of this section.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Administrative costs” means all costs incurred throughout the administration  of the
Justice Reinvestment Equity Program that are not directly related to the delivery of pro-
gram services or projects.
(b) “Culturally responsive service” means a  service that is respectful of, and relevant to,
the beliefs, practices, cultures and  linguistic needs of diverse consumer or client populations
and communities whose members identify as having particular cultural or  linguistic affil-
iations by virtue of their place of birth,  ancestry or ethnic origin, religion, preferred lan-
guage or language spoken  at home. A culturally responsive service has the capacity to
respond to the issues of diverse communities and  require knowledge and capacity at
systemic, organizational, professional and individual levels of intervention.
(c) “Culturally specific organization” means an organization, or a program  within an or-
ganization, that serves a  particular cultural community, that is primarily staffed and led by
members of that community and that demonstrates self-advocacy, positive cultural identity
and intimate knowledge of the lived experience of the community, including but not limited
to:
(A) The impact of structural and individual racism or discrimination on the community;
(B) Specific disparities in  access to services and resources experienced by the commu-
nity; and
(C) Community strengths, cultural practices, beliefs and traditions.
SECTION 16.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $200,000, for the purpose  of carrying out section 16a
of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 16a. (1) The Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission shall evaluate the imple-
mentation of the  Justice Reinvestment Equity Program and monitor the progress of sub-
grants provided by the  Northwest Health Foundation Fund II under section 15 of this 2022
Act.
(2) The commission shall convene a  stakeholder group to assist with the evaluation de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section. The group must be composed of  culturally diverse
persons with expertise in culturally  responsive evaluations, persons with expertise in crimi-
nal justice issues and subgrantees receiving funds under section 15 of this 2022 Act.
(3) The evaluator conducting the evaluation described in subsection  (1) of this section
must have expertise  in racial equity, facilitation of community-based participatory evaluation
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 11
methods and  demonstrated experience with facilitating inclusive processes with diverse
communities.
(4) No later than September 30, 2024, the commission shall provide  a report detailing the
progress of the evaluation described in subsection (1) of this section to the Legislative  As-
sembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, and shall include recommendations for ad-
ditional evaluation needs.
SECTION 17.
Section 16a of this 2022 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
(Justice Reinvestment Program Modifications)
SECTION 18.  Section 53, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 53.  (1)(a) In consultation with the Justice Reinvestment Grant Review Committee estab-
lished under subsection (2) of this section, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall administer
the Justice Reinvestment Program described in this section.  From funds appropriated to the com-
mission for purposes of the program, the  commission shall award grants to counties that establish
a process to assess offenders and provide a  continuum of community-based sanctions, services and
programs that are designed to reduce recidivism and  decrease the county’s utilization of
imprisonment in a Department of Corrections institution while protecting public  safety and holding
offenders  accountable.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, no less than 10 percent of grant funds
awarded under this section  must be distributed to community-based nonprofit organizations that
provide services to victims of crime , with priority given to culturally specific organizations and
culturally responsive services .
(2) The Justice Reinvestment Grant Review Committee is  established, consisting of the following
members:
(a) The Governor shall appoint the following seven members:
(A) One member shall be a district attorney.
(B) One member shall be a county sheriff.
(C) One member shall be a chief of police.
(D) One member shall be a county commissioner.
(E) One member shall be a community corrections director who is not a sheriff.
(F) Two  members shall be representatives of community-based organizations that provide ser-
vices for underserved racial, ethnic or minority communities.
(b) The Chief Justice of the  Supreme Court shall appoint one nonvoting member who is a judge.
(c) The President of the  Senate shall appoint two nonvoting members from among members of
the Senate.
(d) The Speaker  of the House of Representatives shall appoint two nonvoting members from
among members of the House of Representatives.
(3)(a) A majority of the voting members of the  committee constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(b) The committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(c) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an  appointment to
become effective immediately.
(d) The committee shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the  chairperson or a
majority of the voting members of the committee.
(e) Legislative members of the committee shall be entitled to payment of  compensation and ex-
penses under ORS 171.072, payable from funds appropriated to the Legislative Assembly.
(4)(a) An application for a grant described in  this section must be submitted by a local public
safety coordinating council convened under ORS 423.560.
(b) The grant application must include a statement of commitment, from the relevant
stakeholders  of  the service or program for which the county is requesting funding and including the
district attorney, presiding  judge and community corrections director, to reduce recidivism and de-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 12
crease the county’s  utilization of imprisonment in Department of Corrections facilities while pro-
tecting public safety and holding offenders accountable.
(5)(a) During a grant application period established by the commission, the  proportion of grant
funds available to  each county shall be determined in accordance with the formula used to distribute
baseline funding under ORS 423.483.
(b) At  the conclusion of the grant application period, the commission shall award grants [ to
counties] in accordance with rules adopted by the commission.  If unallocated funds remain at the
conclusion of the grant acceptance period, the  commission may establish a supplemental grant pe-
riod and distribute the unallocated funds.
(6)(a) The commission shall regularly  evaluate the community-based sanctions, services and
programs funded under  this section. The commission shall specifically assess the extent to which
each county is reducing utilization of imprisonment in Department of Corrections  facilities by
offenders convicted of felonies under ORS 137.717, 475.752 to 475.980, 811.182, 813.010 or 813.011.
(b) The commission shall report the results of an evaluation conducted under this section to  a
committee of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary.
(7)(a) Before applying for grant funds to administer a  community-based program described in
subsection (10)(a)(D) of this section, the county must obtain  the consent of the presiding judge of the
judicial district in which the county is located.
(b) A grant application to administer a community-based  program described in subsection
(10)(a)(D) of this section must include the costs of appointed counsel.
(8) After consulting with the Justice Reinvestment Grant  Review Committee, the commission
shall adopt rules to administer the Justice Reinvestment Program. The rules must include:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and  distributing grant funds.
Rules described in this paragraph must provide the Justice Reinvestment  Grant Review Committee
with the  ability to approve grant applications for submission for final approval by the commission.
The commission may either approve the grant application or return the application for reconsider-
ation by the committee.
(b) A process for  evaluating the efficacy of community-based sanctions, services and programs
funded under this section.
(c) A requirement that the grant review committee consider, when approving grant  applications,
each county’s historical reduction of utilization of imprisonment  in Department of Corrections fa-
cilities by offenders convicted of felonies under ORS 137.717, 475.752  to 475.980, 811.182, 813.010 or
813.011.
(d) Provisions allowing the grant  review committee to submit to the commission, and the com-
mission to approve, provisional funding plans for counties applying for grants under this section.
(9)(a) If a county does not reduce utilization of imprisonment in Department  of Corrections fa-
cilities by offenders convicted of felonies  under ORS 137.717, 475.752 to 475.980, 811.182, 813.010 or
813.011, upon request of the grant review committee, the commission shall  decline to grant the full
grant amount requested by a county, provide technical  assistance, withhold approved grant funds
or terminate further distribution of the grant award.
(b) If the commission takes an action described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, any remain-
ing moneys may be redistributed  by the commission through a supplemental grant program. Priority
shall be given to  counties funding programs for historically underserved communities including rural
communities, racial, ethnic and minority communities and  tribal communities. Rural counties may
apply for supplemental grants in cooperation with other rural counties.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) [ “Community-based programs” ] “Community-based program”  includes:
(A) Work release programs;
(B) Structured, transitional leave programs;
(C) Evidence-based programs designed to reduce recidivism that include the balanced  adminis-
tration of sanctions, supervision and treatment;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 13
(D) Administering a reentry court under section 29 , [ of this 2013 Act ] chapter 649, Oregon
Laws 2013; and
(E) Specialty courts aimed at medium-risk and high-risk offenders.
(b) “County” includes a regional collection of counties.
(c) “Culturally responsive service” means a service  that is respectful of, and relevant to,
the beliefs, practices, cultures and  linguistic needs of diverse consumer or client populations
and communities whose  members identify as having particular cultural or linguistic affil-
iations by virtue of their place of birth,  ancestry or ethnic origin, religion, preferred lan-
guage or language spoken at home. A culturally responsive service has  the capacity to
respond to the issues of diverse  communities and require knowledge and capacity at
systemic, organizational, professional and individual levels of intervention.
(d) “Culturally specific  organization” means an organization, or a program within an or-
ganization, that serves a particular cultural community, that is primarily staffed  and led by
members of that community and that demonstrates self-advocacy, positive cultural identity
and intimate knowledge of the lived experience of the community, including but not limited
to:
(A) The impact of structural and individual racism or discrimination on the community;
(B) Specific disparities in access to services and resources experienced  by the commu-
nity; and
(C) Community strengths, cultural practices, beliefs and traditions.
(House Bill 3194 (2013) Sunset Extensions)
SECTION 19.
 Section 56, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 56.  Sections  52 and 53 , [ of this 2013 Act ] chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013,  are repealed
on July 1, [ 2023] 2024.
SECTION 20.  Section 60, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 60.  Section 59 , [ of this 2013 Act ] chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013,  is repealed on July 1,
[2023] 2024.
SECTION 21.  Section 7, chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  Section 5 , [ of this 2018 Act ] chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2018,  is repealed  on July 1,
[2023] 2024.
SECTION 22.  Section 8, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) The amendments to ORS 137.717 by section 7 , [of this 2013 Act ] chapter 649, Oregon
Laws 2013, become operative on July 1, [ 2023] 2024.
(2) The amendments to ORS 137.717 by section 7 , [ of this 2013 Act ] chapter 649,  Oregon Laws
2013, apply to crimes committed on or after July 1, [ 2023] 2024.
SECTION 23.  Section 12, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 12.  (1) [ Section 11 of this 2013 Act ] ORS 475.934 becomes operative on July 1, [ 2023] 2024.
(2) [ Section 11 of this 2013 Act ] ORS 475.934  applies to crimes committed  on or after July 1,
[2023] 2024.
SECTION 24.  Section 33, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 33.  Section 29 , [ of this 2013 Act ] chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013,  is repealed on July 1,
[2023] 2024.
SECTION 25.  Section 38, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 38.  (1) The amendments to  ORS 40.015, 144.096, 144.101 and 144.106 by sections 34 to 37 ,
[of this 2013 Act ] chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013,  become operative on July 1, [ 2023] 2024.
(2) The repeal of section 29 , [ of this 2013 Act ] chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013,  by section 33 ,
[of this 2013 Act ] chapter  649, Oregon Laws 2013,  and the amendments to ORS 40.015, 144.096,
144.101 and 144.106 by sections 34 to 37 , [ of this 2013  Act ] chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013,  do not
affect the jurisdiction of a reentry court over a person sentenced under section 29 , [ of this 2013
Act] chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013 .
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 14
CRIMINAL JUSTICE DATA REPORTING
SECTION 26. (1)(a) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, in consultation with the
Department of Corrections, shall collect data concerning the imposition  of supervision con-
ditions on persons on probation or post-prison supervision.
(b) The commission shall review the data described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection
and make the data, disaggregated  by race, ethnicity, gender and county, available to the
public in a clear and accessible format, either in a report or on the website  of the commis-
sion.
(2)(a) The Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission, in coordination with the Department of
Corrections, shall collect data concerning the number of persons on  supervision, persons
revoked from supervision and sentenced to incarceration, and persons sanctioned for  violat-
ing conditions of supervision and serving a sanction in a local correctional facility.
(b) The commission shall review the data described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection
and make the data, disaggregated  by race, ethnicity, gender and county, available to the
public in a clear and accessible format, either in a report or on the website  of the commis-
sion.
(c) The Department of Corrections, community corrections agencies and local  supervi-
sory authorities shall,  at intake of a person on supervision, collect and maintain information
concerning the person’s race, ethnicity and gender,  according to standardized designations
in census data, and shall at least annually provide the data to the commission.
SECTION 27. Section 26 of this 2022 Act is repealed on January 2, 2033.
SECTION 28. (1) No later than  January 15, 2024, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
shall report to the relevant committees of the Legislative  Assembly, in the manner provided
under ORS 192.245, the following information:
(a)(A) The amount and  percentage of Justice Reinvestment Program funds provided to
counties for community-based sanctions, services and programs;
(B) The specific sanctions, services and programs that received program  funds, disag-
gregated by county; and
(C) The populations served by the sanctions, services and programs that received  pro-
gram funds, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender and county; and
(b) The amount  and percentage of Justice Reinvestment Program funds provided to
community-based nonprofit organizations  that provide services to victims of crime, disag-
gregated by county, culturally specific  organization and culturally responsive service pro-
vider.
(2) No later than January 15, 2024, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall report
to the relevant committees of the  Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided under ORS
192.245, the following information:
(a) The amount of Justice Reinvestment Equity  Program funds provided to culturally
specific programs, disaggregated by county and population served; and
(b) The amount of Justice Reinvestment  Equity Program funds provided to culturally
responsive service providers, disaggregated by county and population served.
(3) As used in this section, “culturally responsive service” and “culturally  specific or-
ganization” have the meanings given those terms in section 53, chapter 649, Oregon  Laws
2013.
SECTION 29. Section 28 of this 2022 Act is repealed on July 1, 2024.
APPROPRIATION
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  by section 1, chapter 379, Oregon Laws
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 15
2021, for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, is increased by $421,857, for implementation of
the provisions of this 2022 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 31. The unit captions used in this 2022 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2022 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 32. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 1, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1510 (SB 1510-B) Page 16